dev/conjunction/conjunction.ne.dix
  <!-- यद्यपि; यद्यपि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यद्यपि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तथापि; तथापि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तथापि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसर्थ; यसर्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसर्थ__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसर्थ; यसर्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसर्थ__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अथार्त; अथार्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अथार्त__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- परन्तु; परन्तु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="परन्तु__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथ; साथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथ__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यद्यापी; यद्यापी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यद्यापी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुनत; हुनत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुनत__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुनत; हुनत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुनत__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कि; कि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कि; कि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कि__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तैपनि; तैपनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तैपनि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तैपनि; तैपनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तैपनि__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किनभनें; किनभनें; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किनभनें__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वरू; वरू; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरू__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वरु; वरु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरु__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वरु; वरु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरु__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नत; नत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नत__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पनि; पनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पनि__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तापनि; तापनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तापनि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्थात; अर्थात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्थात__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- या; या; 1 -->
    <pardef n="या__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यद्धपि; यद्धपि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यद्धपि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाहे; चाहे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाहे__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाहे; चाहे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाहे__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नकि; नकि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नकि__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भने; भने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भने__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भने; भने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भने__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ताकि; ताकि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ताकि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनी; भनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तरै; तरै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तरै__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तर्; तर्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तर्__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एवम्; एवम्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एवम्__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तसर्थ; तसर्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तसर्थ__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यदि; यदि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यदि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथसाथै; साथसाथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथसाथै__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यद्वा; यद्वा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यद्वा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- औ; औ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="औ__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथ-साथै; साथ-साथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथ-साथै__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बल्कि; बल्कि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बल्कि__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- न; न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="न__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त; त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वरन्; वरन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरन्__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथै; साथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथै__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="यद्यपि"><i>यद्यपि</i><par n="यद्यपि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="तथापि"><i>तथापि</i><par n="तथापि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="यसर्थ"><i>यसर्थ</i><par n="यसर्थ__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="यसर्थ"><i>यसर्थ</i><par n="यसर्थ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अथार्त"><i>अथार्त</i><par n="अथार्त__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="परन्तु"><i>परन्तु</i><par n="परन्तु__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ"><i>साथ</i><par n="साथ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यद्यापी"><i>यद्यापी</i><par n="यद्यापी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="हुनत"><i>हुनत</i><par n="हुनत__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="हुनत"><i>हुनत</i><par n="हुनत__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="कि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="कि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तैपनि"><i>तैपनि</i><par n="तैपनि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="तैपनि"><i>तैपनि</i><par n="तैपनि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="किनभनें"><i>किनभनें</i><par n="किनभनें__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="वरू"><i>वरू</i><par n="वरू__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="वरु"><i>वरु</i><par n="वरु__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="वरु"><i>वरु</i><par n="वरु__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="नत"><i>नत</i><par n="नत__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="पनि"><i>पनि</i><par n="पनि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तापनि"><i>तापनि</i><par n="तापनि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्थात"><i>अर्थात</i><par n="अर्थात__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="या"><i>या</i><par n="या__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यद्धपि"><i>यद्धपि</i><par n="यद्धपि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहे"><i>चाहे</i><par n="चाहे__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहे"><i>चाहे</i><par n="चाहे__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="नकि"><i>नकि</i><par n="नकि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="भने"><i>भने</i><par n="भने__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="भने"><i>भने</i><par n="भने__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ताकि"><i>ताकि</i><par n="ताकि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="भनी"><i>भनी</i><par n="भनी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="तरै"><i>तरै</i><par n="तरै__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तर्"><i>तर्</i><par n="तर्__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="एवम्"><i>एवम्</i><par n="एवम्__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तसर्थ"><i>तसर्थ</i><par n="तसर्थ__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="यदि"><i>यदि</i><par n="यदि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="साथसाथै"><i>साथसाथै</i><par n="साथसाथै__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यद्वा"><i>यद्वा</i><par n="यद्वा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="औ"><i>औ</i><par n="औ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ-साथै"><i>साथ-साथै</i><par n="साथ-साथै__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="बल्कि"><i>बल्कि</i><par n="बल्कि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="न"><i>न</i><par n="न__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="त"><i>त</i><par n="त__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="वरन्"><i>वरन्</i><par n="वरन्__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="साथै"><i>साथै</i><par n="साथै__cnjcoo"/></e>
